Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 2. Advertising on Limited Access Highway Facilities

§§ 3681-3683.
Repealed.
1967, No. 333 (Adj. Sess.), § 27(a), eff. March 23, 1968.

§ 3683a.
Agreement authorized.

The Agency of Transportation is hereby directed to enter into an agreement before July 1, 1961, with the U.S. Secretary of Commerce as provided in the federal laws relating to the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, but the agreement shall not apply to those segments of the interstate system that traverse commercial or industrial zones within the boundaries of incorporated municipalities as such boundaries existed on September 21, 1959, wherein the use of real property adjacent to the interstate system is subject to municipal regulation or control, or that traverse other areas where the land use as of September 21, 1959, was clearly established by State law as industrial or commercial. Such agreement shall continue valid and binding on all concerned notwithstanding jurisdiction thereof is transferred to an officer or agency of the United States other than the Secretary of Commerce.

In addition to the agreement authorized by subsection (a) of this section, the Agency of Transportation is authorized and directed to enter into such further agreements with the Secretary of Commerce or any other appropriate officer or agency of the United States as may be necessary to continue the receipt of bonus payments and to prevent the loss of federal-aid highway funds under Public Law 89-285, and notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section such agreement may, when necessary, apply to commercial and industrial areas.

The Agency of Transportation is authorized and directed on behalf of this State to consult with the Secretary of Commerce or any other appropriate officer or agency of the United States relative to provisions for signs, displays, and devices permitted at appropriate distances from interchanges on the interstate system in accordance with

23 U.S.C. § 131(f)

as revised by Public Law 89-285, dated October 22, 1965.

The Agency of Transportation is authorized to adopt such rules and standards as may, in its judgment, be necessary to carry out the policy of this State as set forth in chapter 93, subchapter 2 of this title, provided the rules and standards are not less restrictive than any national standards promulgated by the U.S. Secretary of Commerce pursuant to Title 23 of the U.S. Code, or any other appropriate officer or agency of the United States.

HISTORY:

Added

1961, No. 176

, § 4, eff. June 28, 1961; amended

1966, No. 33

(Sp. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 12, 1966;

1967, No. 77

, §§ 3, 5, eff. April 15, 1967;

2015, No. 23

, § 92.

§§ 3683b-3683e.
Repealed.
1967, No. 333 (Adj. Sess.), § 27(a), eff. March 23, 1968.

§ 3683f.
Repealed.
1969, No. 92, § 18, eff. April 19, 1969.

§ 3683g.
Repealed.
1967, No. 77, § 9, eff. April 15, 1967.

§§ 3684-3687.
Repealed.
1967, No. 333 (Adj. Sess.), § 27(a), eff. March 23, 1968.

§ 3688.
Acquisition and compensation proceedings.

Acquisition and compensation proceedings for the purposes of this subchapter shall be in accordance with the provisions of 19 V.S.A. chapter 5 but preliminary public hearings under

19 V.S.A. § 502

need not be conducted and business loss shall not be considered an item of compensable damages.

HISTORY:

Added

1966, No. 33

(Sp. Sess.), § 8, eff. March 12, 1966; amended

1967, No. 77

, § 8, eff. April 15, 1967.